Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.745

Program grants—Sex offender evaluation and treatment programs.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall develop and implement a grant program that allows defense attorneys and counties to apply for funding for sex offender evaluation and treatment programs.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall provide funding to counties for process mapping, site assessment, and training for additional sex offender treatment modalities such as multisystemic therapy-problem sexual behavior or problematic sexual behavior-cognitive behavioral therapy.

[ 2023 c 150 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 150: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.